Idaho, session 2026, H0727.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-6605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6605. VIDEO VOYEURISM. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Broadcast" means the electronic transmittal of a visual image with
the intent that it be viewed by a person or persons.
(b) "Disseminate" means to make available by any means to any person.
(c) "Imaging device" means any instrument capable of recording, stor-
ing, viewing or transmitting visual images.
(d) "Intimate areas" means the nude genitals, nude pubic area, nude
buttocks or nude female nipple.
(e) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, firm,
association, joint venture or any other recognized legal entity or any
agent or servant thereof.
(f) "Place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy"
means:
(i) A place where a reasonable person would believe that he could
undress, be undressed or engage in sexual activity in privacy,
without concern that he is being viewed, photographed, filmed or
otherwise recorded by an imaging device; or
(ii) A place where a person might reasonably expect to be safe from
casual or hostile surveillance by an imaging device; or
(iii) Any public place where a person, by taking reasonable
steps to conceal intimate areas, should be free from the viewing,
recording, storing or transmitting of images obtained by imaging
devices designed to overcome the barriers created by a person's
covering of intimate areas.
(g) "Publish" means to:
(i) Disseminate with the intent that such image or images be made
available by any means to any person; or
(ii) Disseminate with the intent that such images be sold by an-
other person; or
(iii) Post, present, display, exhibit, circulate, advertise or
allow access by any means so as to make an image or images available
to the public; or
(iv) Disseminate with the intent that an image or images be
posted, presented, displayed, exhibited, circulated, advertised


or made accessible by any means and to make such image or images
available to the public.
(h) "Sell" means to disseminate to another person, or to publish, in ex-
change for something of value.
(i) "Sexual act" includes, but is not limited to, masturbation; gen-
ital, anal or oral sex; sexual penetration with an object; or the
transfer or transmission of semen upon any part of the depicted person's
body.
(2) A person is guilty of video voyeurism when, with the intent of
arousing, appealing to or gratifying the lust or passions or sexual desires
of such person or another person, or for his own or another person's lasciv-
ious entertainment or satisfaction of prurient interest, or for the purpose
of sexually degrading or abusing any other person, he uses, installs or per-
mits the use or installation of an imaging device at a place where a person
would have a reasonable expectation of privacy, without the knowledge or
consent of the person using such place.
(3) A person is guilty of video voyeurism when:
(a) With the intent to annoy, terrify, threaten, intimidate, harass,
offend, humiliate or degrade, he intentionally disseminates, publishes
or sells, or threatens or conspires to disseminate, publish or sell, any
image of another person who is identifiable from the image itself or in-
formation displayed in connection with the image and whose intimate ar-
eas are exposed, in whole or in part, or who is engaged in a sexual act;
(b) He knew or reasonably should have known that the person depicted in
the image understood that the image should remain private; and
(c) He knew or reasonably should have known that the person depicted in
the image did not consent to the dissemination, publication or sale of
the image.
(4) A violation of this section is a felony.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230(f)(2),
an information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153 or a telecommuni-
cation service, as defined in section 61-121(2) or 62-603(13), Idaho
Code, for content provided by another person, unless the provider in-
tentionally aids or abets video voyeurism;
(b) Images involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial set-
tings; or
(c) Disclosures made in the public interest including, but not limited
to, the reporting of unlawful conduct or the lawful and common practices
of law enforcement, criminal reporting, legal proceedings or medical
treatment.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-6606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6606. DISCLOSING EXPLICIT SYNTHETIC MEDIA. (1) A person is guilty
of disclosing explicit synthetic media when the person knowingly:
(a) Discloses explicit synthetic media and knows or reasonably should
know that:
(i) An identifiable person portrayed in whole or in part in the
explicit synthetic media did not consent to such disclosure; and


(ii) Disclosure of the explicit synthetic media would cause the
identifiable person substantial emotional distress;
(b) Discloses explicit synthetic media with the intent to annoy, ter-
rify, threaten, intimidate, harass, offend, humiliate, or degrade an
identifiable person portrayed in whole or in part in the explicit syn-
thetic media; or
(c) Possesses and threatens to disclose explicit synthetic media with
the intent to obtain money or other valuable consideration from an iden-
tifiable person portrayed in whole or in part in the explicit synthetic
media.
(2) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor unless such person is guilty of a felony as provided in subsec-
tion (3) of this section.
(3) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section when the iden-
tifiable person is under eighteen (18) years of age or when the person was
previously found guilty of a violation of this section or a similar statute
in another state or any local jurisdiction within the past five (5) years,
notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judgment, is guilty of
a felony punishable by imprisonment for a period no more than ten (10) years,
or by a fine of no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make available by any means to any person.
(b) "Explicit synthetic media" means synthetic media that depicts or
appears to depict:
(i) An identifiable individual engaged in sexual conduct;
(ii) The intimate parts of another individual or artificially
generated intimate parts presented as the intimate parts of an
identifiable individual; or
(iii) The display or transfer of sexual bodily fluids onto any part
of the body of an identifiable individual or from the body of an
identifiable individual.
(c) "Identifiable individual" means a person who is portrayed in whole
or in part in synthetic media and who is recognizable by the person's
face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a
unique birthmark or other recognizable feature.
(d) "Intimate parts" means the nude genitals, pubic area, anus, or
postpubescent female nipple.
(e) "Realistically" means that the synthetic media is sufficiently
convincing such that an ordinary person viewing the synthetic media
would conclude that it is an actual image or video of the identifiable
person but does not include drawings, cartoons, or paintings.
(f) "Sexual conduct" means actual or simulated sexual intercourse,
oral-genital contact, manual genital contact, genital-anal contact,
oral-anal contact, or other physical-genital contact.
(g) "Synthetic media" means any image or video created or altered us-
ing technical means, such as artificial intelligence, to realistically
misrepresent an identifiable individual as engaging in conduct in which
the identifiable individual did not engage.


(h) "Valuable consideration" includes but is not limited to sexually
explicit images or video from the identifiable individual portrayed in
the synthetic media.
(5) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall not apply when:
(a) The disclosure is made for the purpose of a criminal investigation
or prosecution that is otherwise lawful;
(b) The disclosure is for the purpose of, or in connection with, the re-
porting of unlawful conduct;
(c) The explicit synthetic media relates to a matter of public interest
and disclosure serves a lawful public purpose, provided that explicit
synthetic media does not relate to a matter of public interest merely
because a public figure is portrayed in the explicit synthetic media;
(d) The disclosure is for legitimate scientific research or educa-
tional purposes; or
(e) The disclosure is made in the normal course of civil legal proceed-
ings and consistent with common practice or is protected by court order
that prohibits further dissemination.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to an interactive
computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230(f)(2); an information service,
as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153; or a telecommunication service, as defined in
section 61-121(2) or 62-603(13), Idaho Code, for content provided by another
person, unless the provider intentionally aids or abets disclosing explicit
synthetic media.
(7) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect
other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this section are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.